Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB371.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Debt Collection Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"CHIP." The children's health care program under Article XXIII-A of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Consumer." A natural person."Consumer reporting agency." A person that, for monetary fees or dues or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Emergency or medically necessary care." As follows:(1) Health care services that are provided on an emergency basis or are otherwise determined to be appropriate for a patient's condition based on current standards of acceptable medical practice.(2) The term may exclude care or services that are primarily for the convenience of the patient or the patient's 20250SB0371PN0319 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health care provider."Government program." Any of the following:(1) Medical assistance.(2) CHIP."Gross charges." The full, established price for health care services that a health care provider charges uninsured patients before applying any contractual allowances, discounts or deductions."Health care provider." Any of the following:(1) A person registered, certified or licensed to perform health care services within this Commonwealth.(2) A health care facility licensed under Chapter 8 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Health care services." Services for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a physical, behavioral or mental health condition, substance use disorder, illness, injury or disease, which services include procedures, products, devices or medications."Health insurance decision." A decision by an insurer regarding a claim for health care services."Household income." Income calculated by using the methods used to calculate income for purposes of determining eligibility for medical assistance."Impermissible collection action." Any of the following:(1) Placing a lien on a person's primary residence.(2) Reporting adverse information about a person to a consumer reporting agency."Judicial officer." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).20250SB0371PN0319 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "LEP group." A population with limited English proficiency that constitutes the lesser of 1,000 individuals or 5% of the community served by a health care provider or the population likely to be affected or encountered by the health care provider. For purposes of this definition, a health care provider may use any reasonable method to determine the percentage or number of limited English proficiency individuals in the health care provider's community or likely to be affected or encountered by the health care provider."Medical assistance." The Commonwealth's medical assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code."Medical debt." A debt arising from the receipt of health care services."Medical debt collector." Either of the following:(1) A person engaged in the business of collecting or attempting to collect, directly or indirectly, medical debts originally owed or due or asserted to be owed or due to another person.(2) A person who purchases a medical debt for collection purposes, whether the person collects the medical debt itself or hires a third party for collection or an attorney for litigation to collect the medical debt."Patient." As follows:(1) A person who received health care services.(2) The term includes the following:(i) A parent or legal guardian of a person who received health care services and is under 18 years of age.(ii) A guardian under 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 (relating to 20250SB0371PN0319 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incapacitated persons) of an incapacitated person who received health care services."Permissible collection action." Any of the following:(1) Selling a person's medical debt to another party, including a medical debt collector.(2) An action that requires a legal or judicial process, including:(i) Placing a lien on a person's real property, other than a primary residence.(ii) Attaching or seizing a person's bank account or any other personal property.(iii) Commencing a civil action against a person.(iv) Garnishing a person's wages."Primary language." A language that is the preferred communication language for an LEP group."Qualified patient." As follows:(1) A patient with a household income that does not exceed 300% of the Federal poverty level.(2) The term does not include a patient who is experiencing a temporary reduction in income below 300% of the Federal poverty level by reason of a qualifying personal event."Qualifying personal event." A temporary reduction in income by reason of an unforeseen, unintended or unavoidable change in financial circumstances, as determined by the department through regulation.Section 3. Screening for insurance, program eligibility and patient status.In addition to any other actions required by applicable Federal or State law or local government ordinance, a health 20250SB0371PN0319 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care provider shall take the following steps before seeking payment for emergency or medically necessary care from a patient:(1) Verify whether the patient has health insurance.(2) If the patient is uninsured, offer information about and screen the patient for:(i) All public insurance options, including government programs, accepted by the health care provider.(ii) Any financial assistance offered by the health care provider.(3) If requested, provide assistance with the application process for programs identified during screening.Section 4. Protections.(a) Prohibition.--Impermissible collection action.--A health care provider or medical debt collector may not initiate or pursue an impermissible collection action in pursuit of a medical debt.(b) Permissible collection actions.--(1) A health care provider may not initiate or engage in a permissible collection action with respect to a medical debt of a patient prior to screening the patient as required under section 3.(2) At least 30 days before taking a permissible collection action on a medical debt, a health care provider shall notify the patient of potential permissible collection actions and shall include with the notice a statement developed by the department that explains the screening process required under section 3 and includes information regarding the complaint procedure developed by the Attorney 20250SB0371PN0319 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General under section 10.(3) If a health care provider initiates a permissible collection action and it is later determined that the patient was not screened as required under section 3, or it is determined that the patient was eligible for coverage through a government program or the health care provider's financial assistance policy, the health care provider shall:(i) Unless prohibited by law, if a court has entered judgment on the medical debt, request the court to vacate the judgment or reduce the amount of the judgment, including any fees and costs related to the collection to the total amount the patient owes pursuant to a government program or the health care provider's financial assistance policy.(ii) Refund any amount paid by the patient in excess of the amount the patient owes pursuant to a government program on the health care provider's financial assistance policy.(iii) Remedy any other permissible collection action.(4) A health care provider shall not sell a medical debt to a medical debt collector unless, prior to the sale, the health care provider has entered into a legally binding written agreement with the medical debt collector that contains the following terms and conditions:(i) The medical debt collector agrees not to pursue impermissible collection actions to obtain payment.(ii) The medical debt is returnable to or recallable by the health care provider upon a determination that the patient was not screened as required under section 3, or 20250SB0371PN0319 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 it is determined that the patient was eligible for coverage through a government program or the health care provider's financial assistance policy.(iii) If it is determined that the patient was not screened under section 3 or it is determined that the patient was eligible for coverage through a government program or the health care provider's financial assistance policy, the medical debt collector agrees not to pursue payment in excess of what the patient owes pursuant to the government program or financial assistance policy and to assist the health care provider in performing the remediation actions required under paragraph (3).(5) A health care provider that is subject to the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 501(r)(6) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) and has complied with the section and any applicable rules or regulations shall be deemed to have complied with this subsection. In the event the statute, rules or regulations are repealed, abrogated or otherwise determined to be unenforceable, the requirements of this subsection shall apply.(c) Qualifying personal event.--(1) A patient may petition a health care provider or medical debt collector for a temporary cessation of a permissible collection action during the period of a qualifying personal event.(2) Upon receipt of reasonable evidence of a qualifying personal event from a patient, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall grant a temporary cessation of a 20250SB0371PN0319 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permissible collection action against the patient for the duration of the qualifying personal event.(3) The temporary cessation of a permissible collection action shall be subject to redetermination every three months.(4) If a patient provides reasonable evidence that the qualifying personal event is ongoing, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall grant one or more extensions for the duration of the qualifying personal event.(d) Settlement offer.--Prior to engaging in a permissible collection action with respect to a medical debt of a patient, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall make a good faith effort to settle the medical debt with the patient. The following apply:(1) The patient shall have no fewer than 30 calendar days to consider a settlement offer under this subsection.(2) In making a good faith settlement offer, the health care provider or medical debt collector shall consider the following:(i) The amount of the medical debt in relation to the patient's household income.(ii) Whether a payment plan, a reasonable reduction in the principal amount of the medical debt or interest rate charged on the medical debt or other reasonable compromise would allow recovery of a substantial portion of the medical debt from the patient within a reasonable time frame.(iii) Whether the costs associated with a permissible collection action would be unfavorable in comparison to collecting less than the face value of the 20250SB0371PN0319 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical debt.(e) Costs of collection action.--(1) A health care provider or medical debt collector may not assess late fees or other penalties to an outstanding medical debt.(2) A patient shall not be liable for any additional fees or costs levied by a medical debt collector in connection with the purchase, collection or attempts to collect a medical debt.(f) Health insurance appeals.--A health care provider or medical debt collector who knows, or reasonably should know, about an internal or external review or appeal of a health insurance decision may not engage in a permissible collection action with respect to unpaid charges for health care services while the review or appeal is pending. Upon learning of a pending internal or external review or appeal of a health insurance decision, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall immediately suspend any permissible collection action with respect to the medical debt that is the subject of the health insurance decision.(g) Noncompliance.--A health care provider or medical debt collector who is not in material compliance with this act may not engage in a permissible collection action with respect to a medical debt during the material noncompliance. A patient who believes that a health care provider or medical debt collector is not in material compliance with the provisions of this act may file a complaint in accordance with the procedures established by the Attorney General in accordance with section 10(b).Section 5. Price information.20250SB0371PN0319 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Requirement.--A health care provider shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website price information, which shall be kept up to date and accessible via a link from the website's homepage.(b) Contents.--At a minimum, the price information shall include all of the following:(1) A list of gross charges for each health care service offered by the health care provider.(2) The amount that Medicare would reimburse for the health care service, next to the relevant gross charge.(3) Plain-language titles or descriptions of health care services that can be understood by the average consumer.(c) Compliance with Federal law.--A health care provider that is subject to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-18(e) (relating to bringing down the cost of health care coverage) and has complied with the section and any applicable rules or regulations shall be deemed to have complied with this section. In the event the statute, rules or regulations are repealed, abrogated or otherwise determined to be unenforceable, the requirements of this section shall apply.Section 6. Communications.(a) Billing information.--(1) All bills sent to a patient shall include a complete and plain-language description of the date, amount and nature of all charges and all efforts undertaken to bill insurance or public or government programs for the health care services provided.(2) Prior to communicating with a consumer or initiating a permissible collection action for a medical debt, a medical debt collector shall have all billing information required in 20250SB0371PN0319 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this subsection as allowed under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936).(b) Availability of information.--In all communications with a consumer about medical debt, including communication relating to a permissible collection action, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall inform the consumer of the availability of the information specified under subsection (a) and shall offer to and, if requested, provide the information to the consumer.(c) Receipts for payments.--(1) A health care provider or medical debt collector shall apply payments as of the date that payment was received and use that date when assessing interest accumulation.(2) Within 10 business days of receipt of a payment on a medical debt, a health care provider, medical debt collector or an agent of the health care provider or medical debt collector receiving the payment shall furnish a receipt to the person that made the payment.(3) Each receipt under this subsection shall include the following:(i) The amount paid.(ii) The date that payment was received.(iii) The account balance before the most recent payment.(iv) The new balance after application of the payment.(v) The interest rate and interest accrued since the consumer's last payment.(vi) The consumer's account number.20250SB0371PN0319 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) The name of the current owner of the medical debt and, if different, the name of the health care provider.(viii) Whether the payment is accepted as payment in full of the medical debt.(d) Accessibility and notice.--(1) All communications with a consumer regarding medical debt, including all bills, receipts and other correspondence, shall:(i) Be written in plain language at a sixth grade reading level.(ii) Be made accessible to individuals with visual impairments upon request.(iii) Be translated into the patient's primary language upon request.(iv) Include a notice that the patient may qualify for a payment plan or financial assistance.(v) Include a notice that the patient is entitled to a reasonable settlement offer prior to a collection action.(vi) Include a notice that the patient may file a complaint with the Attorney General to enforce the provisions of this act.(vii) Include a notice that the patient may be entitled to certain protections under 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-111 (relating to preventing surprise medical bills) regarding amounts charged for health care services and may access additional information regarding these protections by contacting the Insurance Department.(viii) Comply with any other Federal or State 20250SB0371PN0319 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements with respect to communications regarding consumer debt, including the act of March 28, 2000 (P.L.23, No.7), known as the Fair Credit Extension Uniformity Act.(2) (Reserved).Section 7. Uninsured patients.For emergency or medically necessary health care services provided to a patient who is determined to be uninsured and not otherwise eligible for a government program, a health care provider may not charge an amount greater than the applicable payment rate for those health care services under the Federal Medicare program.Section 8. Payment plans.(a) Petition.--(1) No later than 60 days following receipt of the first bill for a health care service, a patient may petition a health care provider or medical debt collector to determine the patient's status as a qualifying patient.(2) Upon receipt of reasonable evidence that a patient is a qualified patient, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall offer a payment plan to the patient in accordance with subsection (b) and subject to subsection (c).(b) Monthly installments.--Upon determining that a patient is a qualified patient, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall offer a payment plan to recover amounts charged for any emergency or medically necessary care. Under a payment plan offered in accordance with this subsection, a health care provider or medical debt collector shall collect amounts charged, not including amounts owed by third-party payers, in monthly installments such that the qualified patient is not 20250SB0371PN0319 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paying more than 4% of the qualified patient's net monthly household income. A health care provider or medical debt collector must comply with this section before engaging in any permissible collection action against the patient.(c) Accord and satisfaction.--(1) If a qualified patient makes 36 consecutive monthly installment payments as provided under subsection (b), a health care provider or medical debt collector shall consider the qualified patient's bill satisfied and shall permanently cease any collection action of any remaining balance.(2) If a qualified patient fails to make monthly installment payments for six consecutive months, a health care provider or medical debt collector may proceed to a collection action. The health care provider or medical debt collector shall comply with section 4(d) prior to engaging in a collection action under this subsection.(3) If a qualified patient misses a monthly installment payment but resumes making payments, including arrearages for any months missed, the payments shall be counted for purposes of paragraph (1) if the number of missed payments does not exceed six.Section 9. Remedies.(a) Unfair or deceptive act or practice.--A violation of this act constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(b) Equitable relief available.--A consumer may bring an action in court for injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief to enforce the provisions of this act.(c) Remedies not exclusive.--20250SB0371PN0319 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The remedies provided in this section are not intended to be the exclusive remedies available to a consumer.(2) A consumer shall not be required to exhaust any administrative remedies provided by this act before bringing an action in court.(d) Financial assistance policy or agreement.--A financial assistance policy or other written agreement between a patient and a health care provider or medical debt collector shall not contain a provision that, prior to a dispute arising, waives or has the practical effect of waiving, the rights of the patient to resolve that dispute by obtaining any of the following:(1) Injunctive, declaratory or other equitable relief.(2) Multiple or minimum damages as specified by statute.(3) Attorney fees and costs as specified by statute or as available at common law.(4) A hearing at which that party can present evidence in person.(e) Provisions unenforceable.--A provision in a financial assistance policy or other written agreement that violates the provisions of subsection (d) is void and unenforceable. A court may refuse to enforce other provisions of the financial assistance policy or other written agreement as equity may require.Section 10. Enforcement.(a) Authority of Attorney General.--The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this act.(b) Complaint procedure.--The Attorney General shall establish a complaint process whereby an aggrieved patient may file a complaint against a health care provider or medical debt 20250SB0371PN0319 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collector that violates a provision of this act. All complaints filed in accordance with this section shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 11. Medical debt settlement conferences.(a) Procedures.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a collection action arising from or relating to a claim for medical debt not otherwise prohibited by this act, the parties shall engage in a settlement conference prior to any hearing or trial on the matter. The following apply:(1) The court shall schedule the settlement conference for a time and at a place determined by the court, provided at least 20 days' notice is given to each party.(2) The court shall serve the order scheduling the settlement conference on all parties, which shall require the attendance and participation of the parties at the settlement conference.(3) A settlement officer shall conduct the settlement conference. The settlement officer may be a judicial officer or an officer of the court with subject matter experience, as designated by the presiding judicial officer.(4) The settlement officer shall report the outcome of the settlement conference to the presiding judicial officer detailing the terms of the agreement, if authorized by the parties, or the fact that no agreement was reached.(5) If, after a bona fide attempt at settlement, the parties cannot come to an agreement at the settlement conference, a civil action may proceed.(b) Waiver.--If a defendant fails to appear for a settlement conference under this section, the requirements of this section 20250SB0371PN0319 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be waived and the action may proceed upon satisfaction of the court that service under subsection (a)(2) was made and the defendant did not request a rescheduling of the settlement conference within 72 hours of the originally scheduled settlement conference.(c) Confidentiality.--Except as otherwise provided by law, the confidentiality provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 5949 (relating to confidential mediation communications and documents) shall apply to all settlement conferences under this section.(d) Local rules.--Each judicial district may adopt local rules to implement the provisions of this act in accordance with 201 Pa. Code (relating to rules of judicial administration).(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the parties from engaging in settlement or making an agreement at any time prior to the entry of a judgment.Section 12. Prohibition of waiver of rights.A waiver by a patient or other consumer of any protection provided by or any right of the patient or other consumer in accordance with this act is void and may not be enforced by any court or any other person.Section 13. Rules and regulations.(a) Authorization.--The department may promulgate or adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the department may issue temporary regulations. The following apply:20250SB0371PN0319 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The department shall issue the temporary regulations within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this 180-day period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(ii) Notice of the temporary regulations shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(iii) The department shall post the temporary regulations on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(iv) The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) Contents.--Rules and regulations under this section shall establish minimum standards governing the requirements of this act and shall address, at a minimum, the following:20250SB0371PN0319 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A process for determining a patient's status as a qualified patient.(2) Guidance on billing and screening best practices based on the type and size of the health care provider, including policies to prevent the disclosure of patients' personal information to third parties.(3) Specifying the circumstances that constitute a qualifying personal event, which at a minimum shall include:(i) Involuntary loss of employment.(ii) A short-term disability resulting in the inability to earn an income.(iii) Temporary leave from employment authorized under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28 (relating to family and medical leave).(d) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the department shall propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute. The proposed permanent regulations shall be consistent with subsection (c) and may be the same as the temporary regulations.Section 14. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any individual or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 15. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Require a health care provider to refund a payment made to the health care provider for a health care service provided to the patient if no permissible collection action 20250SB0371PN0319 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or impermissible collection action is taken in violation of this act.(2) Prohibit a health care provider or medical debt collector from engaging in a permissible collection action not in violation of this act.Section 16. Applicability.This act shall apply to medical debts incurred and collection actions filed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 17. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following sections shall take effect immediately:Section 1.Section 2.Section 13.Section 16.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0371PN0319 - 21 - 12345678910111213141516171819